Utah statutes.
7-24-305.   Exemptions.

The following are not subject to the requirements of this chapter:

(1)  a depository institution;

(2)  a depository institution holding company; or

(3)  an institution directly or indirectly owned or controlled by one or more:

(a)  depository institutions; or

(b)  depository institution holding companies.

